Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-226
Condemnation proceedings; damage to state-owned land; assessment.

Any damage to the land of the state, in addition to the value of the land purchased, shall be assessed and included in the amount to be paid the state.

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 2, p. 574;

R.S.1943, § 72-226.